src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_RIMPI
!!€gt-norm: Noun 7 front p~m
!!€ rimpi: rimpi+N+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€ rimmessä: rimpi+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ rimpinä: rimpi+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ rimmistä: rimpi+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ rimpien: rimpi+N+Pl+Gen
0:pi       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:me    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:p     N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:m     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:p     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:p     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:p     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:pi       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_ARKI
!!€gt-norm: Noun 7 back k~j
!!€ arki: arki+N+Sg+Nom # weekday
!!€ arjessa: arki+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ arkina: arki+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ arjista: arki+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ arkien: arki+N+Pl+Gen
0:ki       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:je    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:k     N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:j     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:k     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:k     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:k     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:je       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_JÄRKI
!!€gt-norm: Noun 7 front k~j
!!€ järki: järki+N+Sg+Nom # sanity
!!€ järjessä: järki+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ järkinä: järki+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ järjistä: järki+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ järkien: järki+N+Pl+Gen
0:ki       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:je    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:j     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:k     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:je       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

!! !New e-final stems
!! The new words with e stem work exactly like the bisyllabic o, u, y, and ö
!! stems; no stem variation and same allomorph set. This variant can be
!! recognised from singular illative then:

LEXICON N_NALLE
!!€gt-norm: Noun 8 back
!!€ nalle: nalle+N+Sg+Nom # teddy
!!€ nallea: nalle+N+Sg+Par
!!€ nalleen: nalle+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ nalleja: nalle+N+Pl+Par
!!€ nallejen: nalle+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ nalleihin: nalle+N+Pl+Ill
!! Dictionary claims they also have slightly greater probability for archaic
!! form of plural:
!!€ nallein: nalle+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare
0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IN ;


LEXICON N_NISSE
!!€gt-norm: Noun 8 front
!!€ nisse: nisse+N+Sg+Nom # bellhop
!!€ nisseä: nisse+N+Sg+Par
!!€ nisseen: nisse+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ nissejä: nisse+N+Pl+Par
!!€ nissejen: nisse+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ nisseihin: nisse+N+Pl+Ill
0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_NUKKE
!!€gt-norm: Noun 8 k~0 back
!!€ nukke: nukke+N+Sg+Nom # doll
!!€ nukkea: nukke+N+Sg+Par
!!€ nukkeen: nukke+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ nukkeja: nukke+N+Pl+Par
!!€ nukkejen: nukke+N+Pl+Gen 
!!€ nukkeihin: nukke+N+Pl+Ill
0:ke    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ke    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ke    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ke    N_COMPOUND_IN ;


LEXICON N_JEPPE
!!€gt-norm: Noun 8 p~0 front
!!€ jeppe: jeppe+N+Sg+Nom # chap
!!€ jeppeä: jeppe+N+Sg+Par
!!€ jeppeen: jeppe+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ jeppejä: jeppe+N+Pl+Par
!!€ jeppejen: jeppe+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ jeppeihin: jeppe+N+Pl+Ill
0:pe    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_IN ;


LEXICON N_LOTTE
!!€gt-norm: Noun 8 t~0 back
!!€ Lotte: Lotte+N+Prop+Sg+Nom # Lotte
!!€ Lottea: Lotte+N+Prop+Sg+Par
!!€ Lotteen: Lotte+N+Prop+Sg+Ill
!!€ Lotteja: Lotte+N+Prop+Pl+Par
!!€ Lottejen: Lotte+N+Prop+Pl+Gen
!!€ Lotteihin: Lotte+N+Prop+Pl+Ill
0:te    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:te    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_IN ;

!! !A-final stems
!! The basic variation of a-final stems is a:o in plural forms:

LEXICON N_KIRJA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 9
!!€ kirja: kirja+N+Sg+Nom # book
!!€ kirjaa: kirja+N+Sg+Par
!!€ kirjana: kirja+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ kirjassa: kirja+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ kirjoina: kirja+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ kirjojen: kirja+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ kirjoihin: kirja+N+Pl+Ill
0:a   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:o   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN      ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:o   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:o   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:a   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!! Notably, the basic a:o paradigm does not support many ä:ö cases.

LEXICON N_POLITIIKKA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 9 k~0
!!€ politiikka: politiikka+N+Sg+Nom # politics
!!€ politiikkaa: politiikka+N+Sg+Par
!!€ politiikkana: politiikka+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ politiikassa: politiikka+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ politiikkoina: politiikka+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ politiikkojen: politiikka+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ politiikkoihin: politiikka+N+Pl+Ill
0:ka  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ka  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ko N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ka   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:ko   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:ko   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ko   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_TIPPA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 9 p~0
!!€ tippa: tippa+N+Sg+Nom # drop
!!€ tippaa: tippa+N+Sg+Par
!!€ tippana: tippa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ tipassa: tippa+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ tippoina: tippa+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ tippojen: tippa+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ tippoihin: tippa+N+Pl+Ill
0:pa  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:po N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:pa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:po  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:po  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pa     N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:po   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON  N
alastonimpi+N:alaston#im N_RIMPI  ;
aurankurki+N:auran#kur N_ARKI  ;
avantgarde+N:avantgarde   N_NALLE  ;
beetasalpaajasilmätippa+N:beetasalpaaja#silmätip N_TIPPA  ;
bioniikka+N:bioniik N_POLITIIKKA  ;
bouillabaisse+N:bouillabaisse   N_NALLE  ;
boysenmarja+N:boysenmarj N_KIRJA  ;
bridge+N:bridge    N_NISSE  ;
calmette+N:calmette   N_NALLE  ;
chenille+N:chenille    N_NISSE  ;
chiwere+N:chiwere    N_NISSE  ;
crapette+N:crapette   N_NALLE  ;
eau% de% Cologne+N:eau% de% #Cologne   N_NALLE  ;
empire+N:empire    N_NISSE  ;
entrecôte+N:entrecôte    N_NISSE  ;
freestyle+N:freestyle    N_NISSE  ;
freeware+N:freeware   N_NALLE  ;
fyle+N:fyle    N_NISSE  ;
halinalle+N:halinalle   N_NALLE  ;
hankintakauppa+N:hankinta#kaup N_TIPPA  ;
heikkoudentila+N:heikkouden#til N_KIRJA  ;
hemodynamiikka+N:hemodynamiik N_POLITIIKKA  ;
hiussolki+N:hius#sol N_ARKI  ;
hopeasolki+N:hopea#sol N_ARKI  ;
häränkylki+N:härän#kyl N_JÄRKI  ;
impi+N:im N_RIMPI  ;
japaninvarjohiippa+N:japaninvarjo#hiip N_TIPPA  ;
jarrupala+N:jarru#pal N_KIRJA  ;
jarrutusjälki+N:jarrutus#jäl N_JÄRKI  ;
jenkkidoodle+N:jenkki#doodle   N_NALLE  ;
jeppe+N:jep N_JEPPE  ;
jive+N:jive    N_NISSE  ;
jättöpaikka+N:jättö#paik N_POLITIIKKA  ;
kalle+N:kalle   N_NALLE  ;
kamelikurki+N:kameli#kur N_ARKI  ;
karviaismarja+N:karviais#marj N_KIRJA  ;
kavionjälki+N:kavion#jäl N_JÄRKI  ;
keminsaame+N:keminsaame   N_NALLE  ;
kertavaippa+N:kerta#vaip N_TIPPA  ;
kielenkärki+N:kielen#kär N_JÄRKI  ;
kiipimäjalka+N:kiipimäjal N_POLITIIKKA  ;
kimpi+N:kim N_RIMPI  ;
klysma+N:klysm N_KIRJA  ;
kotilokurki+N:kotilo#kur N_ARKI  ;
kotimaankauppa+N:koti#maan#kaup N_TIPPA  ;
kuivakylki+N:kuiva#kyl N_JÄRKI  ;
kunniapaikka+N:kunnia#paik N_POLITIIKKA  ;
kurki+N:kur N_ARKI  ;
kynänkärki+N:kynän#kär N_JÄRKI  ;
kyssäkurki+N:kyssä#kur N_ARKI  ;
käänteissanakirja+N:käänteis#sanakirj N_KIRJA  ;
käärmekurki+N:käärme#kur N_ARKI  ;
lapsikauppa+N:lapsi#kaup N_TIPPA  ;
leksikostatistiikka+N:leksikostatistiik N_POLITIIKKA  ;
lempi+N:lem N_RIMPI  ;
leuankärki+N:leuan#kär N_JÄRKI  ;
lohikala+N:lohi#kal N_KIRJA  ;
lämpöydinkärki+N:lämpö#ydinkär N_JÄRKI  ;
lännenkauppa+N:lännen#kaup N_TIPPA  ;
maatuskanukke+N:maatuska#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
mainosnukke+N:mainos#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
mallinukke+N:malli#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
mande+N:mande   N_NALLE  ;
matriarkka+N:matriark N_POLITIIKKA  ;
merikapteeninkirja+N:meri#kapteenin#kirj N_KIRJA  ;
mohave+N:mohave   N_NALLE  ;
muotinukke+N:muoti#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
nadene+N:na#dene    N_NISSE  ;
nappa+N:nap N_TIPPA  ;
ndebele+N:ndebele    N_NISSE  ;
neulankärki+N:neulan#kär N_JÄRKI  ;
niskanahka+N:niska#nah N_POLITIIKKA  ;
normanniranska+N:normanni#ransk N_KIRJA  ;
nostokurki+N:nosto#kur N_ARKI  ;
nukke+N:nuk N_NUKKE  ;
nutturasolki+N:nuttura#sol N_ARKI  ;
olki+N:ol N_ARKI  ;
painojälki+N:paino#jäl N_JÄRKI  ;
palsternakka+N:palsternak N_POLITIIKKA  ;
paperinukke+N:paperi#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
peitinkarva+N:peitin#karv N_KIRJA  ;
pelle+N:pelle    N_NISSE  ;
pembroke+N:pembroke   N_NALLE  ;
perce+N:perce    N_NISSE  ;
perunakappa+N:peruna#kap N_TIPPA  ;
peukalonjälki+N:peukalon#jäl N_JÄRKI  ;
poikanukke+N:poika#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
politiikka+N:politiik N_POLITIIKKA  ;
posliininukke+N:posliini#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
pronssisolki+N:pronssi#sol N_ARKI  ;
purukasa+N:puru#kas N_KIRJA  ;
purunukke+N:puru#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
pyöränjälki+N:pyörän#jäl N_JÄRKI  ;
quiche+N:quiche   N_NALLE  ;
rajakauppa+N:raja#kaup N_TIPPA  ;
rakennusakustiikka+N:rakennus#akustiik N_POLITIIKKA  ;
riepunukke+N:riepunuk N_NUKKE  ;
rimpi+N:rim N_RIMPI  ;
ritsa+N:rits N_KIRJA  ;
rukiinolki+N:rukiin#ol N_ARKI  ;
räsynukke+N:räsy#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
sakke+N:sak N_NUKKE  ;
sigge+N:sigge    N_NISSE  ;
siimajalka+N:siima#jal N_POLITIIKKA  ;
siippa+N:siip N_TIPPA  ;
sikainfluenssa+N:sika#influenss N_KIRJA  ;
sisalagaave+N:sisal#agaave   N_NALLE  ;
soft% ice+N:soft% ice    N_NISSE  ;
sovitusnukke+N:sovitus#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
sylki+N:syl N_JÄRKI  ;
sätkynukke+N:sätky#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
taikasana+N:taika#san N_KIRJA  ;
takajalka+N:taka#jal N_POLITIIKKA  ;
termiinikauppa+N:termiini#kaup N_TIPPA  ;
trendipelle+N:trendi#pelle    N_NISSE  ;
trumpettikurki+N:trumpetti#kur N_ARKI  ;
tupakkasylki+N:tupakka#syl N_JÄRKI  ;
tutkimusmetodiikka+N:tutkimus#metodiik N_POLITIIKKA  ;
ukulele+N:ukulele   N_NALLE  ;
urheiluvälinekauppa+N:urheilu#väline#kaup N_TIPPA  ;
vahanukke+N:vaha#nuk N_NUKKE  ;
venekurki+N:vene#kur N_ARKI  ;
vesilista+N:vesi#list N_KIRJA  ;
viljakauppa+N:vilja#kaup N_TIPPA  ;
äänijälki+N:ääni#jäl N_JÄRKI  ;
